Illinois, session 104th, SB1500.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Safety and Aid for the Environment in 5Carbon Capture and Sequestration Act is amended by changing 6Section 15 as follows: 7    (415 ILCS 185/15)8    Sec. 15. Integration and unitization of ownership 9interests.10    (a) If at least 2 pore space owners own pore space located 11within a proposed sequestration facility, the owners may agree 12to integrate the owners' interests to develop the pore space 13as a proposed sequestration facility for the underground 14sequestration of carbon dioxide.15    (b) If all of the pore space owners within a proposed or 16permitted sequestration facility do not agree to integrate the 17pore space owners' interests, the sequestration operator may 18petition the Department of Natural Resources to issue an order 19requiring the pore space owners to integrate their interests 20and authorizing the sequestration operator or sequestration 21facility permit holder to develop and use the integrated pore 22space as a sequestration facility for carbon sequestration. 23Such an order for unitization and integration of pore space   SB1500- 2 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1may only be issued if the sequestration operator has obtained 2the rights from pore space owners of pore space underlying at 3least 75% of the surface area above the proposed sequestration 4facility. The petition shall include, but is not limited to:5        (1) the name and address of the petitioners;6        (2) the property index numbers or legal descriptions 7    for the parcels of property and a geologic description of 8    the pore space within the proposed or permitted 9    sequestration facility;10        (3) a disclosure of any parcels of property overlying 11    the pore space to be integrated, identified by property 12    index numbers or legal descriptions, in which the 13    applicant, any of its owners, officers, corporate 14    subsidiaries, or parents, sister companies, or affiliates, 15    at the time of submission of the application or within 10 16    years prior to the submission of the application, have or 17    had any real or personal interest, whether direct or 18    indirect;19        (4) the names and addresses of all pore space owners 20    owning property within the proposed or permitted 21    sequestration facility as disclosed by the records of the 22    office of the recorder for the county or counties in which 23    the proposed or permitted sequestration facility is 24    situated and a list of consenting and nonconsenting pore 25    space owners, as well as a list of all properties for which 26    a pore space owner is unknown or nonlocatable;  SB1500- 3 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1        (5) a statement that the petitioner has exercised due 2    diligence to locate each pore space owner and to seek an 3    agreement with each for pore space rights for the 4    sequestration facility, including a description of the 5    good faith efforts taken to identify, contact, and 6    negotiate with each nonconsenting pore space owner;7        (6) a statement of the type of operations for the 8    proposed or permitted sequestration facility;9        (7) a plan for determining the quantity of pore space 10    sequestration capacity to be assigned to each separately 11    owned parcel of property based on the surface area acreage 12    overlying the proposed or permitted sequestration facility 13    and for using the surface for Class VI well permit 14    required activities under Section 35;15        (8) the method by which pore space owners will be 16    compensated for use of the pore space, and a copy of all 17    agreements entered into with consenting pore space owners 18    regarding the compensation paid to a consenting pore space 19    owner;20        (9) the method by which nonconsenting pore space 21    owners will receive just compensation; and22        (10) a nonrefundable application fee of $250,000.23    The application fee shall be deposited into the Oil and 24Gas Resource Management Fund for the Department of Natural 25Resources' costs related to administration of this Act.26    (c) If the petition for a unitization order concerns   SB1500- 4 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1unknown or nonlocatable pore space owners, the applicant shall 2provide public notice once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in 3the newspaper of the largest circulation in each county in 4which the proposed sequestration facility is located within 30 5days prior to submission of the petition for a unitization and 6integration order. The petitioner shall file proof of such 7notice with the Department of Natural Resources with the 8petition. The petitioner shall also provide public notice of 9the public hearing described in subsection (d) in the same 10manner within 30 days prior to the hearing on the petition for 11a unitization order. The petitioner shall also send notice of 12the filing of the petition and the notice of the public hearing 13via certified mail to the last known address of each 14nonlocatable pore space owner and provide copies of those 15notices to the Department of Natural Resources. The notice 16shall:17        (1) state that a petition for a unitization and 18    integration order has been filed with the Department of 19    Natural Resources;20        (2) describe the formation or formations and pore 21    space proposed to be unitized;22        (3) in the case of an unknown pore space owner, 23    indicate the name of the last known pore space owner;24        (4) in the case of a nonlocatable pore space owner, 25    identify the pore space owner and the owner's last known 26    address; and  SB1500- 5 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1        (5) state that any person claiming an interest in the 2    properties proposed to be unitized should notify the 3    operator of the proposed sequestration facility at the 4    published address within 20 days of the publication date.5    Unknown or nonlocatable pore space owners that have not 6claimed an interest by the time of the Department of Natural 7Resources' public notice in subsection (d) shall be deemed to 8have consented to unitization and integration of their pore 9space.10    (d) Prior to issuing an order to unitize and integrate 11pore space, the Department of Natural Resources shall issue a 12public notice of the petition and shall hold a public hearing 13on the petition. The public notice shall include copies of the 14petition and all included attachments that are not protected 15under the Freedom of Information Act. The public notice shall 16include an opportunity for public comments and shall contain 17the date, time, and location of the public hearing as decided 18by the Department. At the public hearing, the Department shall 19allow interested persons to present views and comments on the 20petition. The hearings must be open to the public and recorded 21by stenographic or mechanical means. The Department of Natural 22Resources will make available on its website copies of all 23comments received.24    (e) The Department of Natural Resources shall issue an 25order unitizing and integrating pore space under subsection 26(b) within 60 days after the hearing upon a showing that:  SB1500- 6 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1        (1) the petitioner has obtained a Class VI well permit 2    or, if the well permit application is still pending at 3    least one year from the date the petition has been filed, 4    that the petitioner has received a Finding of 5    Administrative Completeness from the United States 6    Environmental Protection Agency;7        (2) the petitioner has made a good faith effort to 8    seek an agreement with all pore space owners located 9    within the proposed or permitted sequestration facility;10        (3) the petitioner has obtained the rights from pore 11    space owners of at least 75% of the surface area above the 12    proposed sequestration facility; and13        (4) all nonconsenting pore space owners have received 14    or will receive just compensation for use of the pore 15    space and use of the surface for Class VI well permit 16    required activities. Additionally, such compensation shall 17    be no less than the average total payment package, 18    considered as a whole with respect to an individual owner, 19    provided in agreements during the previous 365 days to 20    similarly situated consenting pore space owners. Such 21    compensation shall exclude any incentives, such as signing 22    bonuses, provided to consenting pore space owners prior to 23    the initiation of injection. Such compensation shall 24    include any operations term or injection term payments 25    made upon or after the initiation of injection provided to 26    consenting pore space owners in consideration of allowing   SB1500- 7 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1    use of their pore space for sequestration of carbon 2    dioxide. In determining if pore space owners are similarly 3    situated, the Department of Natural Resources shall take 4    into account: the size, location, and proximity of the 5    pore space; the geologic characteristics of the pore 6    space; the restrictions on the use of the surface; the 7    actual use of the surface; the relevant law applicable at 8    the time the consenting pore space agreement was signed; 9    title defects and title warranties; the proximity of the 10    pore space owners' property to any carbon sequestration 11    infrastructure on the surface; whether the injection 12    interferes with any known mineral rights; and the fair 13    market value of pore space when entering into a commercial 14    contract. When evaluating the compensation provided to a 15    similarly situated pore space owner, the Department of 16    Natural Resources shall exclude any compensation provided 17    to a pore space owner of a property identified by the 18    applicant in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) and any 19    compensation that was not provided as part of an arm's 20    length transaction.21        Unknown or nonlocatable pore space owners shall also 22    receive just compensation in the same manner as provided 23    to the other nonconsenting pore space owners that must be 24    held in a separate escrow account for 20 years for future 25    payment to the previously unknown or nonlocatable pore 26    space owner upon discovery of that owner. After 20 years,   SB1500- 8 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1    the compensation shall be transferred to the State 2    Treasurer under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property 3    Act.4    (f) The Department of Natural Resources' order for 5unitization and integration of pore space under this Section 6is not effective until the petitioner has been issued a Class 7VI well permit from the United States Environmental Protection 8Agency and the carbon sequestration permit from the Illinois 9Environmental Protection Agency.10    (g) An order for integration and unitization under this 11Section shall: provide for the unitization of the pore space 12identified in the petition; authorize the integration of pore 13space of nonconsenting pore space owners in the pore space 14identified; provide for who may unitize the pore space to 15establish a sequestration facility to be permitted by the 16Illinois Environmental Protection Agency; and make provision 17for payment of just compensation to nonconsenting pore space 18owner under the integration order. 19    (h) A petitioner shall provide a copy of any order for 20unitization and integration of pore space to the Illinois 21Environmental Protection Agency.22    (i) If groundwater monitoring required by a Class VI 23permit indicates that the source of drinking water has been 24rendered unsafe to drink or to provide to livestock, the 25sequestration operator shall provide an alternate supply of 26potable drinking water within 24 hours of the monitoring   SB1500- 9 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1results becoming available and an alternate supply of water 2that is safe for other uses necessary within 30 days of the 3monitoring results becoming available. The alternate supplies 4of both potable water and water that is safe for other uses 5shall continue until additional monitoring by the 6sequestration operator shows that the water is safe for 7drinking and other uses.8    (j) After an order for unitization and integration of pore 9space is issued, the petitioner shall request that the 10Department of Natural Resources issue separate orders 11establishing the amount of just compensation to be provided to 12each nonconsenting pore space owner. When submitting this 13request, the petitioner shall provide information 14demonstrating the good faith efforts taken to negotiate an 15agreement with the nonconsenting pore space owner, including, 16but not limited to, the number and extent of the petitioner's 17contacts with the pore space owner, whether the petitioner 18explained the compensation offer to the pore space owner, 19whether the compensation offer was comparable to similarly 20situated pore space owners, what efforts were made to address 21the pore space owner's concerns, and the likelihood that 22further negotiations would be successful. All orders requiring 23the provision of just compensation shall be made after notice 24and hearing in which the Department of Natural Resources shall 25determine the appropriate amount of just compensation to be 26provided to each nonconsenting pore space owner as described   SB1500- 10 -LRB104 09218 BDA 19275 b1in this Section. The Department shall adopt reasonable rules 2governing such hearings as may be necessary. In such a 3hearing, the burden shall be on the petitioner to prove the 4appropriate amount of just compensation consistent with this 5Section. Both the petitioner and the pore space owner shall be 6permitted to provide testimony and evidence regarding the 7appropriateness of the amount of just compensation proposed by 8the sequestration operator. An order by the Department of 9Natural Resources establishing the appropriate amount of just 10compensation to be provided to a nonconsenting pore space 11owner shall be a final agency decision subject to judicial 12review under the Administrative Review Law. Such proceedings 13for judicial review may be commenced in the circuit court of 14the county in which any part of the pore space is situated. The 15Department of Natural Resources shall not be required to 16certify any record to the court or file any answer in court or 17otherwise appear in any court in a judicial review proceeding, 18unless there is filed in the court with the complaint a receipt 19from the Department of Natural Resources acknowledging payment 20of the costs of furnishing and certifying the record. Failure 21on the part of the plaintiff to file such receipt in court 22shall be grounds for dismissal of the action. 23(Source: P.A. 103-651, eff. 7-18-24.)